hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Grickalice > Studentski miks: Mješavine namkeen i sev; Mješavine orašastih plodova; Mješavina grickalica za zabavu; Studentski miks
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Slané pochutiny > Orechové zmesi: Zmesi Namkeen a Sev; Zmesi orechov; Zmesi na párty občerstvenie; Zmesi orechov a sušeného ovocia
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Przekąski > Mieszanka studencka i mieszanki przekąsek: Mieszanki namkeen i sev; Mieszanki orzechów; Mieszanki przekąsek imprezowych; Mieszanki studenckie
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 軽食・スナック > ナッツ・フルーツミックス: ナムキーン・セブミックス; ナッツミックス; パーティースナックミックス; トレイルミックス
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Prigrizki > Mešanice za na pot in prigrizki: Mešanice Namkeen in Sev; Mešanice oreščkov; Mešanice za prigrizke za zabave; Mešanice za pohodništvo
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Gustări > Amestecuri de fructe uscate și fructe cu coajă lemnoasă: Mixuri namkeen și sev; Mixuri de nuci; Mixuri de gustări pentru petreceri; Mixuri pentru drumeții 
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Produits à grignoter > Mélanges pour apéritif: Mélanges namkeen et sev; Mélanges de noix; Mélanges apéritifs; Mélanges du randonneur
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Entremeses y aperitivos > Frutos secos combinados: Mezclas de namkeen y sev; Mezclas de frutos secos; Mezclas de snacks para fiestas; Mezclas de frutos secos y semillas
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Stuzzichini e snack > Muesli e affini: Miscele di namkeen e sev; Miscele di frutta a guscio; Miscele di snack per feste; Miscele di frutta secca e noci
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Snack Foods > Trail & Snack Mixes: Namkeen & Sev Mixes; Nut Mixes; Party Snack Mixes; Trail Mixes
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Mellemmåltider > Nødde- og snackblandinger: Namkeen- og sev-blandinger; Nøddeblandinger; Snackblandinger til fest; Studenterhavre
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Snacks > Misturas de frutas secas e snacks: Misturas namkeen e sev; Misturas de frutos secos; Misturas de snacks para festas; Trail mix
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Snacks > Frukt- och nötmix: Namkeen- & sev-blandningar; Nötblandningar; Partysnacksmixar; Nöt- & fruktblandningar
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Τροφές σνακ > Ανάμικτοι ξηροί καρποί και αποξηραμένα φρούτα: Μείγματα ναμκίν και σεβ; Μείγματα ξηρών καρπών; Μείγματα σνακ για πάρτι; Μείγματα ξηρών καρπών και φρούτων
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 간식 > 건강 간식 믹스: 남킨 및 세브 믹스; 견과류 믹스; 파티 스낵 믹스; 트레일 믹스
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Atıştırmalıklar > Kuruyemiş ve Meyve Karışımları: Namkeen ve sev karışımları; Karışık kuruyemişler; Parti atıştırmalık karışımları; Trail mix karışımları
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Svačiny a pochutiny > Směsi sušeného ovoce: Směsi namkeen a sev; Směsi ořechů; Párty směsi; Studentské směsi
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Aperitivos e petiscos > Mixes de tira-gosto: Snacks indianos (Namkeen e Sev); Mix de castanhas; Mix de snacks para festas; Mix de castanhas e frutas secas (Trail Mix)
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 零食 > 什锦干果: 印度咸味零食和面条小吃; 混合坚果; 派对混合零食; 混合干果
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Voorgerechten en snacks > Energierepen: Namkeen- en sevmixen; Notenmixen; Partysnackmixen; Trailmixen
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Snack ételek > Túra- és snackkeverékek: Namkeen és sev keverékek; Magkeverékek; Party snack keverékek; Diákcsemegék
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Храни за междинна закуска > Миксове и закуски от сушени плодове: Смеси за сев и намкийн; Смеси от ядки; Смеси за парти закуски; Смеси от ядки и бонбони
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Снеки > Смеси и снеки для походов: Смеси намкин и сев; Ореховые смеси; Снэковые смеси для вечеринок; Смеси из орехов и сухофруктов
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Snacksmat > Tur- og snacksblandinger: Namkeen- og sev-mikser; Nøttemikser; Partysnacksmikser; Turmiks
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Thức ăn nhẹ > Đồ ăn hỗn hợp hạt và trái cây: Hỗn hợp snack namkeen & sev; Hỗn hợp hạt; Hỗn hợp snack tiệc; Hỗn hợp hạt & trái cây khô
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Vorspeisen & Snacks > Studentenfutter: Namkeen- & Sev-Mischungen; Nussmischungen; Party-Snackmischungen; Studentenfutter
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > อาหารว่าง > อาหารว่างแบบผสม: ขนมขบเคี้ยวอินเดีย; ถั่วรวมมิตร; ขนมรวมมิตร; เทรลมิกซ์
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 零食 > 綜合果仁零食: 印度綜合零食; 綜合堅果; 派對綜合零食; 綜合果仁
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Užkandžiai > Užkandžių mišiniai: Sūrūs indiški užkandžiai ir sev mišiniai; Riešutų mišiniai; Vakarėlių užkandžių mišiniai; Džiovintų vaisių, riešutų ir sėklų mišiniai
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Välipalat > Retki- ja välipalasekoitukset: Namkeen- ja sev-sekoitukset; Pähkinäsekoitukset; Välipalasekoitukset; Pähkinä-marjasekoitukset (trail mix)